Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6060.60 of Title 36, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "Breast pump" means a manual or electric device designed for
the extraction of human milk from a lactating person;

Req. No. 14091 Page 1

2. "Breast pump supplies and accessories" include collection
kits, tubing, storage bags, valves, shields, bottles, flanges, and
other items used in conjunction with a breast pump for milk
expression or storage;
3. "Certified Nurse-Midwife" means a person licensed to
practice as an Advanced Practice Registered Nurse–Certified Nurse-
Midwife (APRN-CNM) as defined in the Oklahoma Nursing Practice Act;
4. "Feeding aids" means tools or devices that assist caregivers
in providing nutrition to infants that have difficulty
breastfeeding, need additional supplements, or have special needs;
5. "Lactation consultant" means a person certified by the
International Board of Lactation Consultant Examiners or otherwise
credentialed under state or federal law to provide lactation support
and counseling services;
6. "Licensed Certified Professional Midwife" means a person
licensed pursuant to the Oklahoma Midwives Licensure Act; and
7. "Perinatal doula" means a trained, nonmedical professional
who provides continuous physical, emotional, and informational
support to a person before, during, and after childbirth, or
miscarriage.
B. Required Coverage.
1. Every individual and group health insurance policy,
contract, or plan delivered, issued for delivery, renewed, extended,
or modified in this state shall provide coverage for all services
Req. No. 14091 Page 2

rela ted to pregnancy, postpartum, and newborn care that are rendered
by:
a. a perinatal doula, or
b. an Advanced Practice Registered Nurse–Certified Nurse-
Midwife (APRN-CNM) or Licensed Certified Professional
Midwife, including services for home births, home
visits, and support during labor, or miscarriage.
2. Required coverage shall include all necessary equipment and
medical supplies for home birth and postpartum recovery.
3. Coverage shall include home visits by a lactation consultant
for assessment, counseling, and support.
4. Coverage shall include the purchase, rental, or replacement
of breast pumps, breast pump supplies, breastfeeding supplies, and
feeding aides as recommended by a lactation consultant or health
care provider.
5. Coverage for postpartum services shall be available for not
less than one (1) year following birth.
6. Coverage required under this section shall be provided
without any cost-sharing requirement, including deductibles,
copayments, or coinsurance.
7. Nothing in this section shall limit the number of lactation
consultations, home visits, breast pumps, breast pump supplies,
breastfeeding supplies, or feeding aides that a beneficiary is
entitled to receive.
Req. No. 14091 Page 3

C. Medical Assistance Program.
1. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall ensure that the
state's medical assistance program, SoonerCare, provides coverage
consistent with paragraphs 2 through 7 of subsection B of this
section.
2. Such coverage shall include consultant-recommended or
provider-recommended breast pumps and related supplies without
limitation on quantity or frequency of services.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1378 of Title 68, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The gross receipts or gross proceeds derived from the sale,
rental, or lease of breast pumps, breast pump supplies,
breastfeeding supplies, and feeding aides shall be exempt from the
sales tax and the use tax levied pursuant to the Oklahoma Sales Tax
Code and the Oklahoma Use Tax Code.
B. For purposes of this section, "breast pump", "breast pump
supplies", and "feeding aides" shall have the same meanings as
provided in Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14091 MJ 01/06/26


Req. No. 14091 Page 4